Louisiana, session 2026, HB909.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1059.8 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1059.8. Required coverage for behavioral health crisis services
A.(1) A health insurance issuer offering health coverage plans in this state
shall include coverage for mobile crisis response and behavioral health crisis care
services provided by eligible providers.
(2) The coverage required pursuant to this Section may be subject to annual
deductibles, coinsurance, and copayment provisions as are consistent with those
established by the health insurance issuer.
(3) Prior authorization shall not be required for mobile crisis response and
behavioral health crisis care services as defined in this Section.
(4) The requirements established by a health insurance issuer to insure the
mobile crisis response and behavioral health crisis care services provided by eligible
providers shall not preclude either of these services from operating in this state.
(5) A health insurance issuer, in its discretion, may determine its method for
reimbursements for expenses incurred for services provided pursuant to this Section.
(6) In determining coverage, a health insurance issuer may require the
treating provider to provide documentation of all of the following:
(a) The presence of a behavioral health crisis at the time of service.
(b) The medical necessity of the intervention.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 909 ENROLLED
(c) A disposition and follow-up plan.
B.(1) In order to be eligible to provide mobile crisis response services, a
provider shall be licensed in accordance with R.S. 40:2152 et seq. and shall
coordinate and share information with the Louisiana Department of Health
sanctioned Crisis Hub.
(2) In order to be eligible to provide behavioral health crisis care services,
a provider shall be licensed in accordance with R.S. 40:2152 et seq. or R.S.
40:2180.11 et seq. and shall coordinate and share information with the Louisiana
Department of Health sanctioned Crisis Hub.
C. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them:
(1)(a) "Behavioral health crisis care" means an initial or emergency crisis
response intended to provide relief, resolution, and intervention through crisis
supports and services during the first phase of a crisis in the community for adults.
(b) Services are recovery-oriented and time-limited for up to twenty-three
hours per intervention, generally addressing a single episode that enables an
individual to return home with community-based services for support or be
transitioned to a higher level of care as appropriate if the crisis is unable to be
resolved.
(c) Eligible providers operate twenty-four hours per day, seven days a week
as a walk-in center providing short-term mental health crisis response, offering a
community-based voluntary home-like alternative to more restrictive settings.
(d) Eligible providers must be licensed in accordance with R.S. 40:2152 et
seq. or R.S. 40:2180.11 et seq. and must coordinate and share information with the
Louisiana Department of Health sanctioned Crisis Hub.
(2)(a) "Health insurance issuer" means any entity that offers health insurance
coverage through a policy or certificate of insurance subject to state law that
regulates the business of insurance.
(b) For purposes of this Section, a "health insurance issuer" includes a health
maintenance organization, as defined and licensed pursuant to Subpart I of Part I of
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 909 ENROLLED
Chapter 2 of this Title, nonfederal government plans, and the Office of Group
Benefits.
(3)(a) "Louisiana Department of Health sanctioned Crisis Hub" means the
statewide crisis line that acts as the primary access point for behavioral health crisis
services through a process of triage, referral, and dispatch.
(b) The crisis line is available twenty-four hours per day, seven days a week
and collaborates with health coverage plans and crisis providers to track data and
ensure coordination of supports.
(4)(a) "Mobile crisis response" means an initial or emergency crisis response
intended to provide relief, resolution, and intervention through crisis supports and
services during the first phase of a crisis in the community for children and adults.
(b) Mobile crisis response is a face-to-face, time-limited service provided to
an individual who is experiencing a psychiatric crisis due to mental health or
substance use until the individual experiences sufficient relief or resolution and the
individual can remain in the community and return to existing services or be linked
to an alternative behavioral health service.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.